Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.33
Sale, defined.

Sale means any transfer, exchange, or barter
in any manner or by any means for a consideration and includes any sale made
by any person, whether principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or employee.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 41.